Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Board of Directors

§ 17-19-801.
Requirement for and duties of board.

Each corporation shall have a board of directors.

Except as provided in this act or subsection (c) of this section, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board.

The articles may authorize a person or persons to exercise some or all of the powers which would otherwise be exercised by a board. To the extent so authorized any such person or persons shall have the duties and responsibilities of the directors, and the directors shall be relieved to that extent from such duties and responsibilities.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-802.
Qualifications of directors.

All directors shall be individuals. The articles or bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications for directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-803.
Number of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of three (3) or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased, but to no fewer than three (3), from time to time by amendment to or in the manner prescribed in the articles or bylaws.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-804.
Election, designation and appointment of directors.

If the corporation has members, all the directors, except the initial directors, shall be elected at the first annual meeting of members, and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless the articles or bylaws provide some other time or method of election, or provide that some of the directors are appointed by some other person or designated.

If the corporation does not have members, all the directors, except the initial directors, shall be elected, appointed or designated as provided in the articles or bylaws. If no method of designation or appointment is set forth in the articles or bylaws, the directors, other than the initial directors, shall be elected by the board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-805.
Terms of directors generally.

The articles or bylaws shall specify the terms of directors. Except for designated or appointed directors, the terms of directors shall not exceed five (5) years. In the absence of any term specified in the articles or bylaws, the term of each director shall be one (1) year. Directors may be elected for successive terms.

A decrease in the number of directors or term of office does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws:

The term of a director filling a vacancy in the office of a director elected by members expires at the next election of directors by members; and

The term of a director filling any other vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term that the director is filling.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, the director continues to serve until the director’s successor is elected, designated or appointed and qualifies, or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-806.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the several groups need not be uniform.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-807.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice, signed either manually or in facsimile, to the board of directors, its presiding officer or to the president or secretary.

A resignation is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Standing.—

In this action involving a dispute between two factions of the former Board of Directors of the Wyoming Trial Lawyers College, the finding that one group lacked standing to bring the derivative action was proper because group acted in a manner that approved of one individual’s presence on the Board and in a manner wholly inconsistent with its present objection. Its challenge to her status as a director was therefore barred. Spence v. Sloan, 2022 WY 96, 515 P.3d 572,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2022).

§ 17-19-808.
Removal of directors elected by members or directors.

The members may remove one (1) or more directors elected by them without cause.

If a director is elected by a class, chapter or other organizational unit or by region or other geographic grouping, the director may be removed only by the members of that class, chapter, unit or grouping.

Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, a director may be removed under subsection (a) or (b) of this section only if the number of votes cast to remove the director would be sufficient to elect the director at a meeting to elect directors.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes, or if the director was elected by a class, chapter, unit or grouping of members, the number of votes of that class, chapter, unit or grouping, sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against the director’s removal.

A director elected by members may be removed by the members only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

In computing whether a director is protected from removal under subsections (b) through (d) of this section, it should be assumed that the votes against removal are cast in an election for the number of directors of the class to which the director to be removed belonged on the date of that director’s election.

An entire board of directors may be removed under subsections (a) through (e) of this section.

A director elected by the board may be removed without cause by the vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the directors then in office or any greater number as is set forth in the articles or bylaws; provided, however, that a director elected by the board to fill the vacancy of a director elected by the members may be removed without cause by the members, but not by the board.

If, at the beginning of a director’s term on the board, the articles or bylaws provide that the director may be removed for missing a specified number of board meetings, the board may remove the director for failing to attend the specified number of meetings. The director may be removed only if a majority of the directors then in office vote for the removal.

The articles or bylaws of a religious corporation may:

Limit the application of this section; and

Set forth the vote and procedures by which the board or any person may remove with or without cause a director elected by the members or the board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-809.
Removal of designated or appointed directors.

A designated director may be removed by an amendment to the articles or bylaws deleting or changing the designation.

Appointed directors:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, an appointed director may be removed without cause by the person appointing the director;

The person removing the director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the director and either the presiding officer of the board or the corporation’s president or secretary; and

A removal is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-810.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or if none in the county where registered office is located, may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation, its members holding at least ten percent (10%) of the voting power of any class, or the attorney general in the case of a public benefit corporation, if the court finds that:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation, or a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in W.S.

17-19-830

through

17-19-832

; and

Removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from serving on the board for a period prescribed by the court.

If members or the attorney general commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section, the corporation shall be made a party defendant.

If a public benefit corporation or its members commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section, they shall give the secretary of state written notice of the proceeding.

The articles or bylaws of a religious corporation may limit or prohibit the application of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-811.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, and except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The members, if any, may fill the vacancy. If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a class, chapter or other organizational unit or by region or other geographic grouping, only members of the class, chapter, unit or grouping are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the members;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if a vacant office was held by an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by a designated director, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in the articles or bylaws. In the absence of an applicable article or bylaw provision, the vacancy shall not be filled by the board.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under W.S. 17-19-807(b) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director cannot take office until the vacancy occurs.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-812.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.